src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON k15/6
              k15         ;
              k6          ;

LEXICON k15 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  gestur
  k15e    ;
  k_flt15 ;

LEXICON k15e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ; !s_gen

LEXICON k_flt15
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k16/9
         k16         ;
         k9          ;

LEXICON k16e
         k15e        ;

LEXICON k16
!! __@LEXNAME@__ having double Cns but pointing to k15
  k15 ; ! Double consonant

LEXICON k_flt17
!! __@LEXNAME@__ giving UUML PLDAT and pointing to k_flt15
                k_flt15   ;
  +N+Msc:^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;

LEXICON k17/8/6
 k17      ;
 k8       ;
 k6       ;

LEXICON k17
!! __@LEXNAME@__ giving UUML Dat and pointing to k15
               k15       ; ! Standard, but also u_umlaut
 +N+Msc:^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;

LEXICON k18/11
  k18 ;
  k11 ;

LEXICON k18 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  dansur
  k18e    ;
  k_flt18 ;

LEXICON k18e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:      MscObl_Flag ; ! dans

 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_NULL ; ! s_final

LEXICON k_flt18
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k19 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  meldur
  k19e    ;
  k_flt19 ;

LEXICON k19e/15e
  k19e   ;
  k15e   ;

LEXICON k19e/15
  k19e   ;
  k15   ;

LEXICON k19e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGGEN      ;

LEXICON k_flt19
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLGEN ;


LEXICON k20 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  akur
  k20e    ;
  k_flt20 ;

LEXICON k20e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGGEN      ;

LEXICON k_flt20
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt21
!! __@LEXNAME@__ pointing to k_flt19
  k_flt19 ;

LEXICON k21/20
  k21 ;
  k20 ;

LEXICON k21e
  k19e ;

LEXICON k21 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  stuðul
         k19       ; ! Can't see the diffrence ==> but:
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ; ! here is the difference

LEXICON k22e
  k19e ;

LEXICON k22 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  himmal
         k19       ; ! himlinum etc.
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ; ! himmalinum

LEXICON k23/19
  k23   ;
  k19   ;

LEXICON k23e/19e
  k23e ;
  k19e ;

LEXICON k23 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  róður
  k23e    ;
  k_flt23 ;

LEXICON k23e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_SGGEN_AR   ;

LEXICON k_flt23
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k24/25
              k24      ;
              k25      ;

LEXICON k25/24
              k25      ;
              k24      ;

LEXICON k26/12
    k26     ;
    k12     ;

LEXICON k26/6f
    k26    ;
    k_flt6 ;

LEXICON k27/25
    k27     ;
    k25    ;

LEXICON k28/12
    k28    ;
    k12    ;

LEXICON k28/23
    k28    ;
    k23    ;

LEXICON k28e/12e
    k28e   ;
    k12e   ;

LEXICON k3/1
  k3   ;
  k1   ;

LEXICON k4/1
  k4      ;
  k1      ;

LEXICON k45/6f
  k45    ;
  k_flt6 ;

LEXICON k6/12e
  k6     ;
  k12e   ;

LEXICON k6/15
  k6   ;
  k15  ;

LEXICON k3e/14f
  k3e     ;
  k_flt14 ;

LEXICON k24 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  fløttur
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^OEA S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_PLNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_PLACC    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^OEA S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k25 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  vøllur
  k25e    ;
  k_flt25 ;

LEXICON k25e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^OEA S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt25
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:      S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^OEA S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k26 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  táttur
  k26e    ;
  k_flt26 ;

LEXICON k26e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt26
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k27 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  vøkstur
 +N+Msc:           S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:           S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH      S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH^OEA S_M_SGGEN_AR   ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH      S_M_PLNOM_IR   ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH      S_M_PLACC_IR   ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH      S_M_PLDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH^OEA S_M_PLGEN      ;

LEXICON k28 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  dráttur
  k28e    ;
  k_flt28 ;

LEXICON k28e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:    S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:ur     S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:r S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:r S_M_SGGEN_AR   ;

LEXICON k_flt28
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:r S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:r S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:r S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:r S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k29 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  tráður
 +N+Msc:          S_M_SGNOM      ;
 +N+Msc:          S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:          S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:          S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:^IUMLr   S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:          S_M_SGGEN_AR   ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML%>r S_M_PLNOM_IR   ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML%>r S_M_PLACC_IR   ;
 +N+Msc:          S_M_PLDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML%>r S_M_PLDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:          S_M_PLGEN      ;

LEXICON k30 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  fótur
  k30e    ;
  k_flt30 ;

LEXICON  k30e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt30
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLNOM_UR ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLACC_UR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k31 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  veggur
  k31e    ;
  k_flt31 ;

LEXICON k31e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:j S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt31
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:  S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:j S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:j S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k32 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  ryggur, using k31e
           k31e         ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:j S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGGEN    ;

           k_flt31      ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:j S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:j S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k33 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  hylur
 +N+Msc:    S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:    S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:    S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
 +N+Msc:    S_M_SGGEN    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLACC    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLGEN    ;

LEXICON k34 
!! __@LEXNAME@__ for  drongur
  k34e    ;
  k_flt34 ;

LEXICON k34e
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for sg
 +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:in MscObl_Flag ; ! dreingin
 +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j   S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
 +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGGEN    ;

LEXICON k_flt34
!! ''@LEXNAME@'' for pl
 +N+Msc:    S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:    S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLGEN    ;


!LEXICON k35 ! bonkur (now k34)
! +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGNOM    ;
! +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGACC    ;
! +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGDAT    ;
! +N+Msc:      S_M_SGDAT    ;
! +N+Msc:%>j   S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
! +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
! +N+Msc:      S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
! +N+Msc:      S_M_PLACC_IR ;
! +N+Msc:%>j   S_M_PLDAT    ;
! +N+Msc:%>j   S_M_PLGEN    ;
