src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
germanistikkur:germanistikk k16 ;
autentisitetur:autentisitet k15 ;
akul:akul k21/20 ;
byggakur:byggakur k20 ;
rugakur:rugakur k20 ;
tvørfótur:tvør#fót k30 ;
kavnagli:kavnagl k3/1 ;
eggjakassi:eggjakass k3/1 ;
rótakrampi:rótakramp k4/1 ;
sessur:sess k18/11 ;
formanssessur:formanssess k18/11 ;
skjálvtamiðdepil:skjálvtamiðdepil k21 ;
plóghøvil:plóghøvil k21 ;
lungnatuberklar:lungnatuberkl k_flt21 ;
neytatuberklar:neytatuberkl k_flt21 ;
møplar:møpl k_flt21 ;
smokkuleggur:smokkulegg k31 ;
fjósveggur:fjósvegg k31 ;
staraleggir:staralegg k_flt31 ;
jarðarkonuleggir:jarðarkonulegg k_flt31 ;
sniffil:sniffil k22 ;
tummil:tummil k22 ;
tittul:tittul k22 ;
bekkur:bekk k32 ;
miðbekkur:miðbekk k32 ;
flaggrevstur:flaggrevstur k23 ;
sprongdarróður:sprongdarróður k23 ;
sundhylur:sundhyl k33 ;
dunnuhylur:dunnuhyl k33 ;
stórdani:stórdan k3e/14f ;
trøstur:trøst k24 ;
ljómtrøstur:ljómtrøst k24 ;
reiðsludrongur:reiðslu#dreing k34 ;
arnarvongur:arnar#veing k34 ;
sinfanastreingir:sinfana#streing k_flt34 ;
sinfansstreingir:sinfans#streing k_flt34 ;
feilur:feil k15 ;
vaðhornsliður:vaðhornslið k15 ;
fretstingir:fret#sting k_flt15 ;
olympiuleikir:olympiu#leik k_flt15 ;
magasnertir:magasnert k_flt15 ;
miðvøllur:mið#vøll k25 ;
mararvøttur:mararvøtt k25 ;
plettur:plett k16 ;
gangingarháttur:gangingarhátt k26 ;
táttur:tátt k26 ;
sovisalur:sovisal k17 ;
matsalur:matsal k17 ;
drápshvalur:drápshval k17 ;
fingrastavir:fingrastav k_flt17 ;
vøkstur:vøkstur k27 ;
uppvøkstur:uppvøkstur k27 ;
listadansur:listadans k18 ;
tátudansur:tátudans k18 ;
fráblástur:fráblástur k23/19 ;
íblástur:íblástur k23/19 ;
gróður:gróður k23/19 ;
stórsigur:stórsigur k19 ;
fremstifingur:fremstifingur k19 ;
mjølkveistur:mjølkveistur k19 ;
kvørkrar:kvørkr k_flt19 ;
rørar:rør k_flt19 ;
fyritráður:fyritráð k29 ;
nælingartráður:nælingartráð k29 ;
tvingsil:tvingsil k21e ;
bleðil:bleðil k21e ;
seiggil:seiggil k22e ;
roykur:royk k15e ;
produktivitetur:produktivitet k15e ;
dani:da2n k3e/14f ;
stuldur:stuldur k19e ;
høvundur:høvund k6/12e ;
rithøvundur:rithøvund k6/12e ;
sjangur:sjangur k19e ;
feigdarfongur:feigdarfeing k34e ;
ránsfongur:ránsfeing k34e ;
rossamergur:rossamerg k31e ;
seyðamergur:seyðamerg k31e ;
hveitiakur:hveitiakur k20 ;
áarstrekkur:áarstrekk k16e ;
sullur:sull k6/15 ;
heilasvullur:heilasvull k16/9 ;
tannsvullur:tannsvull k16/9 ;
róðrartrælur:róðrartræl k15/6 ;
mammonstrælur:mammonstræl k15/6 ;
ennispónur:enni#spón k45/6f ;
hølvispónur:hølvi#spón k45/6f ;
flogherur:flogher k6/15 ;
krintilborur:krintilbor k15/6 ;
ættaransur:ættarans k18e ;
heiðurssessur:heiðurs#sess k18 ;
plássur:pláss k18e ;
froysur:froys k18e ;
tapigøltur:tapi#gølt k24/25 ;
pissigøltur:pissi#gølt k24/25 ;
skræpugøltur:skræpu#gølt k24/25 ;
uttanatlestur:uttanat#lestur k23 ;
omanrakstur:oman#rakst k28/23 ;
innrakstur:inn#rakst k28/23 ;
útrakstur:út#rakst k28/23 ;
rekstur:rekst k28e ;
vekstur:vekst k27/25 ;
illvøkstur:ill#vøkst k28 ;
krypilsvøkstur:krypils#vøkst k28 ;
kunstur:kunstur k19e/15 ;
gandakunstur:ganda#kunstur k19e/15 ;
svartikunstur:svarti#kunstur k19e/15 ;
parisarkunstur:parisar#kunstur k19e/15e ;
kredittur:kreditt k16/9 ;
leppaluttur:leppa#lutt k16e ;
tyrviluttur:tyrvi#lutt k16e ;
veiðiháttur:veiði#hátt k26/12 ;
hugsingarháttur:hugsingar#hátt k26/12 ;
ynskisháttur:ynskis#hátt k26/12 ;
nevasláttur:neva#slátt k28/12 ;
útsláttur:út#slátt k28/12 ;
inndráttur:inn#drátt k28/12 ;
virkistáttur:virkis#tátt k26/6f ;
gamanstáttur:gamans#tátt k26/6f ;
høvuðstáttur:høvuðs#tátt k26/6f ;
slóttur:slótt k28e/12e ;
kappslóttur:kapp#slótt k28e/12e ;
høttur:høtt k25e ;
eygnaknøttur:eygna#knøtt k25/24 ;
himinknøttur:himin#knøtt k25/24 ;
heimsknøttur:heims#knøtt k25/24 ;
skvøttur:skvøtt k16 ;
hiplingsfótur:hiplings#fót k30 ;
klovastavur:klova#stav k17/8/6 ;
skindilstavur:skindil#stav k17/8/6 ;
merkisstavur:merkis#stav k17/8/6 ;
vanheiður:van#heiður k19e ;
frumgróður:frum#gróður k23e/19e ;
eftirgróður:eftirgróður k23e/19e ;
nýgróður:nýgróður k23e/19e ;
mjøður:mjøð k25e ;
borgarlýður:borgar#lýð k15e ;
jemmil:jemmil k22e ;
jaksil:jaksil k21/20 ;
illgrunsil:ill#grunsil k21e ;
jaksul:jaksul k21/20 ;
gjáramorgun:gjára#morgun k21 ;
